Illinois, session 104th, SB3441.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Business Corporation Act of 1983 is amended 5by changing Sections 15.35, 15.65, 15.90, and 15.97 as 6follows: 7    (805 ILCS 5/15.35)  (from Ch. 32, par. 15.35)8    (Text of Section from P.A. 102-16, 103-8, and 103-592)9    Sec. 15.35. Franchise taxes payable by domestic 10corporations. For the privilege of exercising its franchises 11in this State, each domestic corporation shall pay to the 12Secretary of State the following franchise taxes, computed on 13the basis, at the rates and for the periods prescribed in this 14Act:15        (a) An initial franchise tax at the time of filing its 16    first report of issuance of shares.17        (b) An additional franchise tax at the time of filing 18    (1) a report of the issuance of additional shares, or (2) a 19    report of an increase in paid-in capital without the 20    issuance of shares, or (3) an amendment to the articles of 21    incorporation or a report of cumulative changes in paid-in 22    capital, whenever any amendment or such report discloses 23    an increase in its paid-in capital over the amount thereof   SB3441- 2 -LRB104 16689 SPS 30093 b1    last reported in any document, other than an annual 2    report, interim annual report or final transition annual 3    report required by this Act to be filed in the office of 4    the Secretary of State.5        (c) An additional franchise tax at the time of filing 6    a report of paid-in capital following a statutory merger 7    or consolidation, which discloses that the paid-in capital 8    of the surviving or new corporation immediately after the 9    merger or consolidation is greater than the sum of the 10    paid-in capital of all of the merged or consolidated 11    corporations as last reported by them in any documents, 12    other than annual reports, required by this Act to be 13    filed in the office of the Secretary of State; and in 14    addition, the surviving or new corporation shall be liable 15    for a further additional franchise tax on the paid-in 16    capital of each of the merged or consolidated corporations 17    as last reported by them in any document, other than an 18    annual report, required by this Act to be filed with the 19    Secretary of State from their taxable year end to the next 20    succeeding anniversary month or, in the case of a 21    corporation which has established an extended filing 22    month, the extended filing month of the surviving or new 23    corporation; however if the taxable year ends within the 24    2-month period immediately preceding the anniversary month 25    or, in the case of a corporation which has established an 26    extended filing month, the extended filing month of the   SB3441- 3 -LRB104 16689 SPS 30093 b1    surviving or new corporation the tax will be computed to 2    the anniversary month or, in the case of a corporation 3    which has established an extended filing month, the 4    extended filing month of the surviving or new corporation 5    in the next succeeding calendar year.6        (d) An annual franchise tax payable each year with the 7    annual report which the corporation is required by this 8    Act to file.9    On or after January 1, 2020 and prior to January 1, 2021, 10the first $30 in liability is exempt from the tax imposed under 11this Section. On or after January 1, 2021, and prior to January 121, 2024, the first $1,000 in liability is exempt from the tax 13imposed under this Section. On or after January 1, 2024, and 14before January 1, 2025, the first $5,000 in liability is 15exempt from the tax imposed under this Section. On and after 16January 1, 2025 and before January 1, 2028, the first $10,000 17in liability is exempt from the tax imposed under this 18Section. On or after January 1, 2028 and before January 1, 192029, the first $100,000 in liability is exempt from the tax 20imposed under this Section. The provisions of this Section 21shall not require the payment of any franchise tax that would 22otherwise have been due and payable on or after January 1, 232029.24    There shall be no refunds or proration of franchise tax 25for any taxes due and payable on or after January 1, 2029 on 26the basis that a portion of the corporation's taxable year   SB3441- 4 -LRB104 16689 SPS 30093 b1extends beyond January 1, 2029.2    This Section is repealed on January 1, 2030.3(Source: P.A. 102-16, eff. 6-17-21; 103-8, eff. 6-7-23; 4103-592, eff. 6-7-24.) 5    (Text of Section from P.A. 102-282, 102-558, 103-8, and 6103-592)7    Sec. 15.35. Franchise taxes payable by domestic 8corporations. For the privilege of exercising its franchises 9in this State, each domestic corporation shall pay to the 10Secretary of State the following franchise taxes, computed on 11the basis, at the rates and for the periods prescribed in this 12Act:13        (a) An initial franchise tax at the time of filing its 14    first report of issuance of shares.15        (b) An additional franchise tax at the time of filing 16    (1) a report of the issuance of additional shares, or (2) a 17    report of an increase in paid-in capital without the 18    issuance of shares, or (3) an amendment to the articles of 19    incorporation or a report of cumulative changes in paid-in 20    capital, whenever any amendment or such report discloses 21    an increase in its paid-in capital over the amount thereof 22    last reported in any document, other than an annual 23    report, interim annual report or final transition annual 24    report required by this Act to be filed in the office of 25    the Secretary of State.  SB3441- 5 -LRB104 16689 SPS 30093 b1        (c) An additional franchise tax at the time of filing 2    a report of paid-in capital following a statutory merger 3    or consolidation, which discloses that the paid-in capital 4    of the surviving or new corporation immediately after the 5    merger or consolidation is greater than the sum of the 6    paid-in capital of all of the merged or consolidated 7    corporations as last reported by them in any documents, 8    other than annual reports, required by this Act to be 9    filed in the office of the Secretary of State; and in 10    addition, the surviving or new corporation shall be liable 11    for a further additional franchise tax on the paid-in 12    capital of each of the merged or consolidated corporations 13    as last reported by them in any document, other than an 14    annual report, required by this Act to be filed with the 15    Secretary of State from their taxable year end to the next 16    succeeding anniversary month or, in the case of a 17    corporation which has established an extended filing 18    month, the extended filing month of the surviving or new 19    corporation; however if the taxable year ends within the 20    2-month period immediately preceding the anniversary month 21    or, in the case of a corporation which has established an 22    extended filing month, the extended filing month of the 23    surviving or new corporation the tax will be computed to 24    the anniversary month or, in the case of a corporation 25    which has established an extended filing month, the 26    extended filing month of the surviving or new corporation   SB3441- 6 -LRB104 16689 SPS 30093 b1    in the next succeeding calendar year.2        (d) An annual franchise tax payable each year with the 3    annual report which the corporation is required by this 4    Act to file.5    On or after January 1, 2020 and prior to January 1, 2021, 6the first $30 in liability is exempt from the tax imposed under 7this Section. On or after January 1, 2021 and prior to January 81, 2024, the first $1,000 in liability is exempt from the tax 9imposed under this Section. On or after January 1, 2024, and 10before January 1, 2025, the first $5,000 in liability is 11exempt from the tax imposed under this Section. On and after 12January 1, 2025 and before January 1, 2028, the first $10,000 13in liability is exempt from the tax imposed under this 14Section. On or after January 1, 2028 and before January 1, 152029, the first $100,000 in liability is exempt from the tax 16imposed under this Section. The provisions of this Section 17shall not require the payment of any franchise tax that would 18otherwise have been due and payable on or after January 1, 192029.20    There shall be no refunds or proration of franchise tax 21for any taxes due and payable on or after January 1, 2029 on 22the basis that a portion of the corporation's taxable year 23extends beyond January 1, 2029.24    This Section is repealed on January 1, 2030.25(Source: P.A. 102-282, eff. 1-1-22; 102-558, eff. 8-20-21; 26103-8, eff. 6-7-23; 103-592, eff. 6-7-24.)   SB3441- 7 -LRB104 16689 SPS 30093 b1    (805 ILCS 5/15.65)  (from Ch. 32, par. 15.65)2    Sec. 15.65. Franchise taxes payable by foreign 3corporations. For the privilege of exercising its authority to 4transact such business in this State as set out in its 5application therefor or any amendment thereto, each foreign 6corporation shall pay to the Secretary of State the following 7franchise taxes, computed on the basis, at the rates and for 8the periods prescribed in this Act:9        (a) An initial franchise tax at the time of filing its 10    application for authority to transact business in this 11    State.12        (b) An additional franchise tax at the time of filing 13    (1) a report of the issuance of additional shares, or (2) a 14    report of an increase in paid-in capital without the 15    issuance of shares, or (3) a report of cumulative changes 16    in paid-in capital or a report of an exchange or 17    reclassification of shares, whenever any such report 18    discloses an increase in its paid-in capital over the 19    amount thereof last reported in any document, other than 20    an annual report, interim annual report or final 21    transition annual report, required by this Act to be filed 22    in the office of the Secretary of State.23        (c) Whenever the corporation shall be a party to a 24    statutory merger and shall be the surviving corporation, 25    an additional franchise tax at the time of filing its   SB3441- 8 -LRB104 16689 SPS 30093 b1    report following merger, if such report discloses that the 2    amount represented in this State of its paid-in capital 3    immediately after the merger is greater than the aggregate 4    of the amounts represented in this State of the paid-in 5    capital of such of the merged corporations as were 6    authorized to transact business in this State at the time 7    of the merger, as last reported by them in any documents, 8    other than annual reports, required by this Act to be 9    filed in the office of the Secretary of State; and in 10    addition, the surviving corporation shall be liable for a 11    further additional franchise tax on the paid-in capital of 12    each of the merged corporations as last reported by them 13    in any document, other than an annual report, required by 14    this Act to be filed with the Secretary of State, from 15    their taxable year end to the next succeeding anniversary 16    month or, in the case of a corporation which has 17    established an extended filing month, the extended filing 18    month of the surviving corporation; however if the taxable 19    year ends within the 2-month period immediately preceding 20    the anniversary month or the extended filing month of the 21    surviving corporation, the tax will be computed to the 22    anniversary or, extended filing month of the surviving 23    corporation in the next succeeding calendar year.24        (d) An annual franchise tax payable each year with any 25    annual report which the corporation is required by this 26    Act to file.  SB3441- 9 -LRB104 16689 SPS 30093 b1    On or after January 1, 2020 and prior to January 1, 2021, 2the first $30 in liability is exempt from the tax imposed under 3this Section. On or after January 1, 2021 and before January 1, 42024, the first $1,000 in liability is exempt from the tax 5imposed under this Section. On and after January 1, 2024 and 6before January 1, 2025, the first $5,000 in liability is 7exempt from the tax imposed under this Section. On and after 8January 1, 2025 and before January 1, 2028, the first $10,000 9in liability is exempt from the tax imposed under this 10Section. On or after January 1, 2028 and before January 1, 112029, the first $100,000 in liability is exempt from the tax 12imposed under this Section. The provisions of this Section 13shall not require the payment of any franchise tax that would 14otherwise have been due and payable on or after January 1, 152029.16    There shall be no refunds or proration of franchise tax 17for any taxes due and payable on or after January 1, 2029 on 18the basis that a portion of the corporation's taxable year 19extends beyond January 1, 2029.20    This Section is repealed on January 1, 2030.21(Source: P.A. 102-16, eff. 6-17-21; 102-558, eff. 8-20-21; 22102-813, eff. 5-13-22; 103-592, eff. 6-7-24.) 23    (805 ILCS 5/15.90)  (from Ch. 32, par. 15.90)24    Sec. 15.90. Statute of limitations. 25    (a) Except as otherwise provided in this Section and   SB3441- 10 -LRB104 16689 SPS 30093 b1notwithstanding anything to the contrary contained in any 2other Section of this Act, prior to January 1, 2030, no 3domestic corporation or foreign corporation shall be obligated 4to pay any annual franchise tax, fee, or penalty or interest 5thereon imposed under this Act, nor shall any administrative 6or judicial sanction (including dissolution) be imposed or 7enforced nor access to the courts of this State be denied based 8upon nonpayment thereof more than 7 years after the date of 9filing the annual report with respect to the period during 10which the obligation for the tax, fee, penalty or interest 11arose, unless (1) within that 7 year period the Secretary of 12State sends a written notice to the corporation to the effect 13that (A) administrative or judicial action to dissolve the 14corporation or revoke its authority for nonpayment of a tax, 15fee, penalty or interest has been commenced; or (B) the 16corporation has submitted a report but has failed to pay a tax, 17fee, penalty or interest required to be paid therewith; or (C) 18a report with respect to an event or action giving rise to an 19obligation to pay a tax, fee, penalty or interest is required 20but has not been filed, or has been filed and is in error or 21incomplete; or (2) the annual report by the corporation was 22filed with fraudulent intent to evade taxes payable under this 23Act. A corporation nonetheless shall be required to pay all 24taxes that would have been payable during the most recent 7 25year period due to a previously unreported increase in paid-in 26capital that occurred prior to that 7 year period and interest   SB3441- 11 -LRB104 16689 SPS 30093 b1and penalties thereon for that period, except that, from 2February 1, 2008 through March 15, 2008, with respect to any 3corporation that participates in the Franchise Tax and License 4Fee Amnesty Act of 2007, the corporation shall be only 5required to pay all taxes that would have been payable during 6the most recent 4 year period due to a previously unreported 7increase in paid-in capital that occurred prior to that 7 year 8period. Beginning January 1, 2030, no domestic corporation or 9foreign corporation shall be obligated to pay any annual 10franchise tax, fee, or penalty or interest thereon imposed 11under this Act, nor shall any administrative or judicial 12sanction (including dissolution) be imposed or enforced nor 13access to the courts of this State be denied based upon 14nonpayment thereof more than 7 years after the date of filing 15the annual report with respect to the period during which the 16obligation for the tax, fee, penalty or interest arose.17    (b) If within 2 years following a change in control of a 18corporation the corporation voluntarily pays in good faith all 19known obligations of the corporation imposed by this Article 2015 with respect to reports that were required to have been 21filed since the beginning of the 7 year period ending on the 22effective date of the change in control, no action shall be 23taken to enforce or collect obligations of that corporation 24imposed by this Article 15 with respect to reports that were 25required to have been filed prior to that 7 year period 26regardless of whether the limitation period set forth in   SB3441- 12 -LRB104 16689 SPS 30093 b1subsection (a) is otherwise applicable. For purposes of this 2subsection (b), a change in control means a transaction, or a 3series of transactions consummated within a period of 180 4consecutive days, as a result of which a person which owned 5less than 10% of the shares having the power to elect directors 6of the corporation acquires shares such that the person 7becomes the holder of 80% or more of the shares having such 8power. For purposes of this subsection (b) a person means any 9natural person, corporation, partnership, trust or other 10entity together with all other persons controlled by, 11controlling or under common control with such person.12    (c) Except as otherwise provided in this Section and 13notwithstanding anything to the contrary contained in any 14other Section of this Act, no foreign corporation that has not 15previously obtained authority under this Act shall, upon 16voluntary application for authority filed with the Secretary 17of State prior to January 1, 2001, be obligated to pay any tax, 18fee, penalty, or interest imposed under this Act, nor shall 19any administrative or judicial sanction be imposed or enforced 20based upon nonpayment thereof with respect to a period during 21which the obligation arose that is prior to January 1, 1993 22unless (1) prior to receipt of the application for authority 23the Secretary of State had sent written notice to the 24corporation regarding its failure to obtain an application for 25authority, (2) the corporation had submitted an application 26for authority previously but had failed to pay any tax, fee,   SB3441- 13 -LRB104 16689 SPS 30093 b1penalty or interest to be paid therewith, or (3) the 2application for authority was submitted by the corporation 3with fraudulent intent to evade taxes payable under this Act. 4A corporation nonetheless shall be required to pay all taxes 5and fees due under this Act that would have been payable since 6January 1, 1993 as a result of commencing the transaction of 7its business in this State and interest thereon for that 8period.9(Source: P.A. 95-233, eff. 8-16-07; 95-707, eff. 1-11-08; 1096-66, eff. 1-1-10.) 11    (805 ILCS 5/15.97)  (from Ch. 32, par. 15.97)12    Sec. 15.97. Corporate Franchise Tax Refund Fund. 13    (a) Beginning July 1, 1993, a percentage of the amounts 14collected under Sections 15.35, 15.45, 15.65, and 15.75 of 15this Act shall be deposited into the Corporate Franchise Tax 16Refund Fund, a special Fund hereby created in the State 17treasury. From July 1, 1993, until December 31, 1994, there 18shall be deposited into the Fund 3% of the amounts received 19under those Sections. Beginning January 1, 1995, and for each 20fiscal year beginning thereafter, 2% of the amounts collected 21under those Sections during the preceding fiscal year shall be 22deposited into the Fund.23    (b) Beginning July 1, 1993, moneys in the Fund shall be 24expended exclusively for the purpose of paying refunds payable 25because of overpayment of franchise taxes, penalties, or   SB3441- 14 -LRB104 16689 SPS 30093 b1interest under Sections 13.70, 15.35, 15.45, 15.65, 15.75, and 216.05 of this Act and making transfers authorized under this 3Section. Refunds in accordance with the provisions of 4subsections (f) and (g) of Section 1.15 and Section 1.17 of 5this Act may be made from the Fund only to the extent that 6amounts collected under Sections 15.35, 15.45, 15.65, and 715.75 of this Act have been deposited in the Fund and remain 8available. On or before August 31 of each year, the balance in 9the Fund in excess of $100,000 shall be transferred to the 10General Revenue Fund. Notwithstanding the provisions of this 11subsection, for the period commencing on or after July 1, 122022, amounts in the fund shall not be transferred to the 13General Revenue Fund and shall be used to pay refunds in 14accordance with the provisions of this Act. Within a 15reasonable time after December 31, 2029, but no later than 16December 31, 2030, the Secretary of State shall direct and the 17Comptroller shall order transferred to the General Revenue 18Fund all amounts remaining in the Fund.19    (c) This Act shall constitute an irrevocable and 20continuing appropriation from the Corporate Franchise Tax 21Refund Fund for the purpose of paying refunds upon the order of 22the Secretary of State in accordance with the provisions of 23this Section.24    (d) This Section is repealed on January 1, 2031.25(Source: P.A. 102-282, eff. 1-1-22; 103-8, eff. 6-7-23.) 26    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect upon   SB3441- 15 -LRB104 16689 SPS 30093 b1becoming law.